District of Columbia statutes.
4-205.04

Relocation of recipients to another jurisdiction.

Recipients of assistance from the District who move to another jurisdiction with intent to remain in that State shall be ineligible to receive assistance from the District immediately upon the date of the recipient’s last day of residency in the District of Columbia.

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 504, 29 DCR 1060
Oct. 27, 1995, D.C. Law 11-72, § 201(b), 42 DCR 4728
Apr. 18, 1996, D.C. Law 11-110, § 64, 43 DCR 530
1981 Ed., § 3-205.4.

Expiration of Law 11-72

See note to § 4-205.01.